South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S253.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Funding for independent compliance consultant SECTION 1.    The General Assembly hereby redirects the funding appropriated to the Office of the State Treasurer for Audit Support pursuant to Proviso 117.186 of the General Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 2024-2025 to the Department of Administration to be utilized to hire an independent compliance consultant to assess and oversee compliance with all recommendations in the AlixPartners forensic accounting report and other relevant studies conducted in Fiscal Years 2023-2024 and 2024-2025. Procurements by the Department of Administration made pursuant to this section are exempt from the purchasing procedures of the South Carolina Procurement Code in Chapter 35, Title 11. Implementation of forensic accounting recommendations SECTION 2.    The Office of the State Treasurer, the Office of the Comptroller General, and the Office of the State Auditor shall work in concert to effectuate the implementation of recommendations made in the AlixPartners forensic accounting report and other relevant studies conducted during Fiscal Years 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 that do not require statutory change. The Office of the State Treasurer, the Office of the Comptroller General, and the Office of the State Auditor shall begin implementation of these recommendations immediately in coordination and with oversight of the Department of Administration. The Department of Administration has the authority to request support from any agency of the State for the implementation of recommendations and all reasonable requests shall be granted. Report SECTION 3.    The Office of the State Treasurer, the Office of the Comptroller General, and the Office of the State Auditor shall provide a monthly written report on the status of implementation of the recommendations made to their individual agencies to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, the Department of Administration, and to the independent compliance monitor beginning no later than March 31, 2025. The independent compliance monitor shall provide review and comment on the monthly reports to the Department of Administration no later than thirty days following receipt. The Department of Administration shall convene a monthly public meeting of the Office of the State Treasurer, the Office of the Comptroller General, and the Office of the State Auditor to provide the input of the independent compliance monitor. Report SECTION 4.    Upon completion of implementation of all recommendations not requiring statutory change and no later than one year after the effective date of this joint resolution, the independent compliance monitor shall provide a comprehensive report that includes the status of the implementation of all recommendations to the Joint Bond Review Committee for review and comment. The Joint Bond Review Committee is authorized to extend the monthly reporting requirements in this section as it may deem necessary. Timeline for implementation SECTION 5.    No later than ninety days after the effective date of this joint resolution, the Office of the State Treasurer, the Office of the Comptroller General, and the Office of the State Auditor shall provide a detailed timeline for implementation of all recommendations made in the AlixPartners forensic accounting report and other relevant studies conducted during Fiscal Years 2023-2024 and 2024-2025, including those recommendations requiring statutory change to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, the Department of Administration, and to the independent compliance monitor. Such a timeline notwithstanding, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the recommendations referenced in this section that do not require statutory change be fully implemented no later than one year after the effective date of this joint resolution. Time effective SECTION 6.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 6th day of March, 2025. Approved the 7th day of March, 2025. __________